epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/et.xml
	<patterns>
		.aa4
		.aasta5
		.ahe4li
		.al4a
		.al4gas
		.antiik5
		.ap3l
		.ap3r
		.art5r
		.au3a
		.eba3
		.ee4
		.eela4
		.ek3l
		.ek5r
		.gu4a
		.hie5
		.idi4
		.inim5a
		.ise5e
		.is4o
		.ja4e
		.ja4t
		.ka4e
		.ka2o
		.ke5hi
		.kip5r
		.ku4pl
		.ku5sa
		.kusee4
		.la4pl
		.le4e
		.le5hi
		.lemmik5
		.le5se
		.lõpp3
		.ma4a
		.maa5a
		.ma5j
		.mi5sa
		.mo4e
		.nek3
		.ni4p
		.nisu5
		.noa3
		.oa3
		.oo4
		.pap4p
		.pea3a
		.raadio5
		.re4a
		.re2o
		.rep3r
		.re5so
		.rü5hi
		.sak5r
		.sap3r
		.se4a
		.sk4
		.skaa5
		.so5li
		.sp4
		.st4
		.teoo4
		.tet3r
		.tina5
		.toa3
		.ts4
		.tsi4s
		.turba5
		.tus2
		.tu3sa
		.ul4ga
		.ulu4k
		.um2b
		.uu4
		.vaa3l
		.vask3
		.vere3
		.õppe5
		.ää4
		.õõ4
		.öö4
		.ühi4s
		.üle3e
		.ür2
		.üü4
		aaa5l
		a1aas
		4aab
		aa4bi.
		5aadel.
		aadio5a
		a1ae
		a4aer
		aa4fe
		aa4gan
		aa2h
		aa4has
		aa1i
		aai4g
		aa4is
		a5ait
		aa2j
		aa2la
		aa4lae
		aala4r
		aa4las
		aa4leh
		aa4lek
		aa4lel
		aalg4
		aali4ke
		aal3k
		a5allik
		aal3t4
		aa2l3õ
		aa4lü
		aa4mad
		aa4man
		aa4mee
		a5ameer
		aa4mö
		4aan
		aa4nam
		aa4nat
		a5andm
		aan4duu
		aa5ni
		aant4
		aa4pek
		aa4pen
		aa4ra4b
		aa4raf
		aa4raj
		aara4l
		a5arter
		aa2r3õ
		aa4rö
		aa4rü
		aa4sab
		aa4sai
		aa4sar
		aa2se4
		aa4so
		3aas5ta
		a5a4sul
		aa4sut
		aa4sü
		4aat
		aa4taa
		aa4tas
		aa4teh
		5aatom
		aa4tõ
		aa4tüh
		a1au
		aaši5
		a1b
		4a3ba
		a5be
		3abie
		a4bij
		5abs
		a1d
		a4dad
		a4deo
		a2der
		a3di
		adu4r
		adu3se
		a4dö
		a5eali
		ae2d
		3aed.
		2aee
		a3ees
		ae4f
		1aeg.
		ae4ga4j
		ae4gi
		3aegn
		2a1e2h
		4aei
		4aek
		a3eks
		2ael
		a5elani
		ae2le
		ae4lo
		ae4lu.
		4ae2m
		4aen
		ae4pi
		ae2s
		a3esi
		4aett
		a1f
		a4fek
		a1g
		3a4gent
		agia4
		a3go
		5agreg
		agud4
		1a2hi.
		ah4kar
		5ahnu
		4ai.
		ai2a
		5aian
		ai4hu
		ai4ke
		ai4kl
		a3ilm
		ai4lu
		ai4me.
		aimp4
		4ain.
		a5inf
		a5inime
		4ains
		a3inse
		ai4pr
		ai2sa
		5aistin
		aist4r
		ai4va
		a1j
		a3ja.
		a4jale
		5ajalo
		a4jalu
		1a2jam
		4ajo
		ajut4
		a1k
		akaa4s
		a4kaat
		ak4as
		3aken.
		a3ki
		ak4kis
		ak4kr
		a3klas
		ak4lau
		a5klii
		a3krii
		ak3ro
		4aks
		ak4te4l
		a2ku.
		aku4map
		a5kvali
		3alald
		ala4mas
		a4laüh
		ale4le
		al4et
		alet4t
		5algat
		al4ged
		a3li
		ali4san
		a4liste
		5allee.
		al4le4h
		al4luj
		al2lü
		a4lob
		als4
		4alt
		4alu.
		a4lud
		1alun
		alü4h
		a4lüt
		a1m
		4am.
		a5ma.
		a4maad
		3ametn
		amit4
		am4o
		am4pal
		5amper.
		4amü
		2an.
		3analü
		5anatoom
		an4das
		an4deo
		an4dog
		2ane
		a4neh
		a3ni
		a4niso
		4anj
		an4kr
		3anku
		an4nah
		4ano
		anos4
		3ansam
		4anst
		3anten
		5antilo
		ao4d
		ao4he
		a3oht
		ao4j
		ao2le
		ao2lu
		ao2m
		a3oma
		ao4nu
		aoo4p
		ao2pe
		a5opera
		ao2r
		a5oras
		a1osa
		ao4su
		a1ots
		a1p
		a2par
		5aparaa
		a5part
		a3parv
		a3pi
		a3pla
		a3po
		ap4pal
		ap4pin
		ap4pis
		ap3ri
		ap3ron
		a4pru
		a3pä
		4ara
		arak4k
		a4rase
		5areng
		3aretu
		3arhit
		2ari
		ari4al
		ari4ap
		4ark
		ar4kel
		5armast
		5armee.
		a4ro4l
		1arst
		5artikk
		3arua
		3arvam
		5arvestus
		1arvu
		ar4vää
		asa4las
		a4same
		a4sau
		ase4ma
		as5ema.
		1a2sen
		a4seos
		a4sese
		a4sett
		3a4setu
		as4fä
		1a2si.
		asi4ala
		asi3an
		a4sind
		asip4
		5asjan
		askõ4
		as4kõl
		a5slaav
		a4sok
		as3ole
		aso4p
		as4pet
		as3pl
		as2po
		a3spor
		as4san
		ass5t
		4asti
		5astme
		ast4rak
		a4su4b
		a4sud
		asui4
		a4suss
		a5suu
		a1t
		a3ta
		a4taž
		5ateljee
		atii4v
		atmi4k
		5atroo
		at4ros
		at4rus
		at4soo
		ats4p
		at4sü
		att4s
		4atu
		au2a
		aua3l
		au4ba.
		4aud
		au4de.
		a3ui
		4au2j
		au4ke
		aulu3
		aulus4
		au4pü4
		a5urg
		aus4o
		au2su
		a3usul
		1auto
		autoo4
		auto5s
		aut4r
		a1v
		av4a
		a4vans
		a3var
		a4veh
		a1õ2
		a1ö2
		a1ä2
		a1ü2
		až4ni
		4a1š
		5baa
		baa4g
		baa4k
		baa4s
		bab4
		bae4
		bag4
		ba4he
		ba4ju.
		ba3k4r
		bak4s
		bak4v
		bap4l
		bap4r
		ba4rõ
		basa4s
		bas4ko
		bas4pe
		bat4r
		4bb
		2bd
		be3a4
		beb2
		bef4
		beg4
		be4lü4
		be2ra2
		berk4
		bero4
		be4rõ4
		be4si
		be4st
		bes4tis
		bet4r
		4bf
		4bh
		bha4
		bi4ala
		bia4v
		2bi1e
		bi4en
		4binõ
		bi4pla
		bis4a
		bi4si
		bis4k
		2b1j
		2b1k
		2b1l
		bl4e
		blet4
		b2lon
		2bm
		2bn
		4bort
		2bp
		2b1r
		3brig
		bros4
		2bs
		b3so
		2bt4
		4buks
		bu4lõ
		3bum
		buse5
		bu4si4
		bus4kr
		2b3v
		1da
		daa2
		da5ab
		daala4
		da4do
		dae4
		daf4
		d5ain
		da4leh
		da4lum
		da4lus
		5dam
		4dann
		da4num
		dao4
		darat4
		4darb
		dar4de
		4da4re
		4daru
		2darv
		d3arv.
		4dasen
		da4sum
		2d5b2
		2dd
		1de
		dea2
		2deaa
		de5av
		ded4
		2dee.
		dee4le
		4dehe
		dek3l
		dek4s
		5del.
		de4lau
		4de4lek
		4deluv
		de4pr
		dep5ressi
		dere4
		de4rel
		de4rep
		5dero
		deru4
		2df
		2d5g
		2d1h
		1di
		dia4v
		did4
		dig4
		dii4g
		diina4
		dii4sa
		dii4su
		4dilm
		4dini
		di2os
		di4plo
		dis4ai
		di4sar
		di4sas
		dis4pr
		dit4r
		2d1j
		2d3k4
		dkop4
		2d1l
		dle4v
		dlust4
		2d1m
		dmee4
		dmi4k
		2d1n
		1do
		do4h
		doi4r
		2dos
		d3osa
		5dosk
		2d3p4
		2d1r4
		5draama.
		drao4
		3dreen
		d4rel
		d2ren
		3drena
		2d1s4
		dsar4
		2d3t2
		1du
		du4b
		due4
		2d5uks
		d4u2s
		du4s1a
		du4see
		dusk4
		2d1v
		2dõ
		dõ4l
		4dä
		2dül
		dü4li
		4dü4r
		5düü
		4dž
		2d2š
		3dšem
		eaa2
		ea3aj
		e1aas
		ea2b
		e3abi
		e1ae
		ea2hi
		e1ai
		ea2j
		eak4s
		eak4v
		ea2la
		e3ala.
		e1a4lu
		ea2me
		e5amet
		e5ann
		ea4nu
		eao4
		ea2pa
		e1ar
		ea4re
		ea2s
		e4ass
		e5aste
		e5asut
		e3au
		ea2v
		e3ava.
		e1b
		e1d
		ed4a
		e3eali
		e3ees
		ee4fe
		eei4
		eek4r
		ee2la
		3eelar
		e5elekt
		eel5uu
		ee4nai
		ee4nal
		ee4nam
		ee4no
		eent4
		ee4pai
		e5e4pit
		5eepos
		ee4ral
		eer5ap
		ee4ros
		ee4rot
		ee4sin
		e5esine
		ee4s5ist
		5eeskir
		ee4sü
		ee4tõm
		ee4tä
		e1f
		e1g
		egaa4
		egas4t
		e4goi
		4eha
		e2he.
		e2hi
		e3hin
		5ehist
		1e4hit
		5ehiti
		eh4ta4
		4ehä
		ei4dul
		ei4e
		eie5ri
		ei2ga
		e3iga.
		ei4ha
		ei4he
		e3ilm
		ei2lu
		ei4mem
		5eine.
		ei4roo
		e5i4sa.
		ei4sist
		ei4tau
		ei4tõ
		ei4va.
		e3j
		e3ka
		e4kahi
		e3ke
		ek4kap
		ek2l
		ek4lo
		e3k4o
		ek3re
		e3krii
		4eks.
		5eksam.
		3eksem
		eksi3k
		3ekska
		eksp3r
		5ekstr
		ek4tül
		e3kü
		elaa4v
		e4lagr
		e2lam
		3elamu
		el4an
		5elanik
		eleis4
		e4leks
		5elektro
		3eleme
		5elevaato
		e3li
		e4lid
		elii4t
		el4kus
		e4l4ob
		elo4p
		els4t
		elt2r
		el4tü
		e2lu
		1elu.
		e5lub
		elu5i4
		1e4lun
		e3lus.
		e4luss
		el5uss.
		el4üh
		e1m
		5emand.
		e5mat
		emne3
		emos4
		emp4r
		5emuls
		endus3
		5enelas
		e5nem
		3energ
		e4nese
		e4nesl
		enk5l
		enk4r
		en4sal
		en4tos
		en4tü
		eo5a
		eo4ja
		e3o4le
		eo2lu
		eo2ma
		eoo4p
		eo5pl
		e3osa.
		e3osak
		e5osali
		e5osav
		eos4f
		e3ots.
		e1p
		e3pl
		e4pli
		ep4lu
		e1r
		e3raa
		5erakon
		5erald
		e4rao
		erei2
		erek4
		5ergut
		erih4
		eri4uu
		er4nau
		e4ro4r
		erp4
		er2pr
		ers4k
		er4taa
		er4tak
		er4tes
		e4rud
		es1an
		1e2se.
		e5sek
		e5sen
		e5sil
		eska4j
		eska4s
		eske4
		es5kel
		esk3l
		esk3r
		es2k5ö
		es4laa
		es3ole
		es4or
		es2po
		e3spor
		es4sist
		4est
		es4tü
		e3su
		esup4
		e1t
		e3t4a
		e2ten
		5etendus.
		etii4s
		et2ra
		et4sin
		et4soo
		et4sü
		et4taj
		1ette
		et4tru
		et4tä
		et4tü
		4etu
		e4tõ4d
		e4tüm
		eu4de
		e3u2j
		e3u2l
		e5u2n
		eu4p
		eu4s
		e5usk
		e3uu
		e1v
		e3v4a
		e1õ2
		e3ö4
		e1ä2
		e1ü4
		e1š
		5faa
		faa4n
		4fa4d
		2ff
		1fi
		fii4t
		4fj
		4fk
		2f1l
		f2lo
		5floora
		2f1n
		1fo
		folk5
		fo4ro
		2f1r
		f2re
		3frees
		2fs
		2f1t
		ftat4
		3fu
		3gaa
		gaa4r
		4gaast
		4gab
		4gaed
		gag4
		2gah
		ga2hi
		gai4g
		ga5is
		ga3k4
		5gam
		ga3o
		ga3p
		4gart
		4garv
		g4as
		4ga4suk
		5gata
		gat4r
		gau4
		ga4va.
		ga4van
		2g3b
		2gd4
		gea4
		ge4du.
		gek4
		ge5kl
		4gekse
		ge4lah
		gela4s
		ge4leh
		ge3lu
		ge4lä
		ge4nan
		geok4
		ge4or
		4geos
		4gerg
		ge4rus
		4gf
		4gg
		2g1h
		gi2aj
		gii4s
		gi3k
		4ginf
		4gint
		gio4r
		gi3pl
		gi4san
		gi4sil
		gi4sö
		git4r
		gi4vaj
		2g1j
		2g1k
		2g1l
		g4lüt
		2g1m
		2g1n
		gne4ta
		gne4te4
		4goh
		go4le
		go4ma
		go4po
		2g1p4
		2g1r
		g2ran
		5granaa
		3g2rav
		g2ru
		3grup
		4g1s4
		2g1t2
		g3tr
		3gu
		gub4
		gue4
		gu5i
		gu4nel
		gu3o
		gup4
		gu4sen
		gu4sä
		guu4j
		2g1v
		2g3õ4
		4gä
		gü4l
		3ha
		haa4ri
		haa4s
		hal4lai
		5har
		hasa4
		hat4r
		1he
		hee4m
		hee4s
		hei4s
		hek4v
		2hel.
		hels4
		het4r
		4h1h
		hhe4l
		1hi
		hia2
		hii4s
		5hil
		5him
		hio2
		hi4san
		hi4sar
		hise4l
		hi4st4
		hi4sü
		5hits
		h1j
		hjaa4
		4hk
		h4kal
		h4kas
		h4kis
		hk3l
		h4ko4
		hk3r
		hks4
		hkt4
		h4kusk
		h4ku4su
		h4kõ
		h4kä
		h1l
		hle4n
		4h1m
		h4mo4
		h4mü
		h1n
		hnika5
		1ho
		hom4o
		4hp4
		hrs4
		4ht
		h2ta
		hta2j
		h5tak
		hta4l
		ht5ar
		hta4su
		h4teg
		hte4n
		hte4r
		h4tid
		h4to
		h4tr
		ht5s4
		h4tö
		h4tä
		1hu
		hu3a
		hue4
		hui4d
		huk4l
		hup4
		hu3sa
		2h1v
		hvad4
		hvast4
		hve4l
		h4vini
		h4vo
		hvu4s
		1hõ
		3hö
		1hä
		3hü
		4ia
		iaa2
		iaa4l
		ia5alane
		i3aast
		i5a4bi
		ia4bo
		i1ae
		ia2g
		ia2h
		i3aine
		i1a2j
		ia4kr
		i3akt
		i1a2la
		i5alb
		i3alli
		i1a2lu
		ia2me
		i5amet.
		ia2na
		i5andj
		i5andm
		ia4ne
		i5anne
		ia2p4
		i3apar
		ia5pr
		ia2re
		i3arm
		ia4ru
		i1arv
		ia2s
		ias4ke
		i5aste.
		i3asu
		ia4tel
		iat4r
		i1au
		iau4l
		i5a4vaj
		i5avald
		i1b
		i4bad
		i4bau
		i1d
		5ideaa
		idii4
		idlu4
		ie2
		i3eali
		i1eel
		iei4
		i1eks
		i5elani
		i1elu
		i3eos
		ie4ri
		iers4
		i3esi
		ie5so
		i5ess
		ie4st
		i3eten
		ietu4s
		i1f
		i1g
		i4ga4g
		i5gar
		5igatsu
		i4gav
		ig4ram
		ih4le
		ih4te
		ih4tin
		ii4a
		ii4deo
		ii4du.
		iie3
		ii4es
		ii4gaa
		ii4ga4s
		ii4ha
		iika4
		ii4kis
		iik4ro
		iiks4t
		iikt4
		ii4lab
		ii4lad
		ii4lae
		ii4last
		ii4leh
		ii4lel
		ii4les
		ii2lõ4
		ii4lü
		ii4mai
		iimat4
		ii4met
		ii4nai
		ii4nau
		i5inde
		i5inf
		ii3ni
		i5inimen
		iinit4
		iink4
		iino4
		ii4nol
		ii4nos
		ii4nõ
		ii4pr
		ii4ran
		ii4rau
		iirs4
		ii4rü
		ii4san
		iise4l
		ii4sev
		ii4sik.
		ii2ta
		ii4teh
		iito4
		ii4tom
		ii4tos
		iit5re
		ii4tõ
		ii4tü
		ii4ves
		ii4vet
		ii2vo
		i1j
		i1k
		i4kalu
		i4ka4re
		i4kark
		i4kaut
		i4k5elu
		ike4si
		i3klaa
		i3klas
		ik4ler
		i5klub
		ikop4
		ikos4
		i4kov
		i3kre
		ik3ro
		ik4sar
		iks4k
		iks4po
		ik3t2r
		i3ku
		iku3a
		il4a
		ila4s
		i4lasi
		ilia4
		i4lisi
		il4kan
		il4kõ
		ille5s
		illo4
		5ilme.
		il4mot
		3ilmut
		ilo5g2
		ilp3l
		il4ti
		i5lun
		ilu3sa
		5ilustu
		ilü4h
		i1m
		i4melu
		imi4g
		imisu4
		i4mo4l
		5imper
		i1n
		ind3al
		5indeks
		inde4r
		ind4re
		2ine
		inee4s
		i4neh
		i4neks
		ini4kü
		i2nim
		ini4mas
		i4nime
		5inimene
		5iniml
		i4nini
		inna5a
		inni4si
		3insen
		1insp
		1inst
		3inven
		io4de
		io4h
		i3oht
		i5ohv
		io4j
		i5oks.
		io2le
		i3olek
		io2lu
		i5oluk
		io4lü
		io2ma
		i5oman
		ioo4da
		ioo4ne
		iooni3
		io2p
		i3oper
		i5ork
		i1osa
		ios4f
		ios4p
		ios4t
		iost4r
		io4su
		i3ots.
		i3otsi
		io4tü
		i1p
		i3pla
		ip4lu
		ip4ro
		ip4sas
		ipse4
		ip4sep
		ip4sus
		i4ra4b
		i4rase
		ir4dis
		ir4nõ
		i2rui
		iruu4
		isaa4v
		isa4ja
		i4sana
		isa4re
		i4sarh
		i4selo
		i3sem
		iset4s
		isi4g
		i2so
		3isola
		i5soli
		is5oma
		iso4r
		i3sot
		i3s4pek
		is3pl
		i3s4por
		is3sp
		5istand
		i5s4tiil
		5istme
		ist4ru
		ist4se
		i5stsee
		5istutu
		i3su
		i4sõm
		i2sü4l
		isü4r
		2it
		itaa2
		itee4l
		it4rak
		it4ras
		it2ru4
		its3k
		it4so
		itte1
		itt4s
		iu4b
		iu2da
		iu4gi
		iu2j
		i3uju
		iu4la
		iu4mar
		iu4me4
		iu2mo
		iu4ni
		iu4pu
		iu5sa
		i5uss.
		iu2su
		iuti4
		i3uu
		i1v
		i4vad
		i4vakt
		i4va4lus
		i4vant
		i4vau
		i4veh
		ive4l
		iviil5
		i4vü
		i1õ2
		i1ä4
		i1ü2
		i1ž
		j4a
		3jaa
		ja1aj
		jaa4l
		jaa4r
		jaa4s
		jab4
		jad4
		ja5el
		jae4r
		jag4
		ja3i2
		ja5kra
		5jama
		5jame
		jao4h
		ja3p4
		jas4ke
		jas4tii
		jat4r
		jat4su
		jau4b
		jau4l
		je3lu
		3jo
		joo4k
		jue4
		5juma
		ju4sei
		juse4l
		5jõ
		5jä
		1ka
		kaa4da
		kaa3de
		ka5aj
		ka4al
		kaa4ra
		kaa4sis
		kaa4ta
		4kader
		4kaed
		4kaeg
		kae3lu
		kag4
		kahe5i
		4kaia
		2kain
		ka5ist
		kaitse5
		ka4jav
		ka4ju.
		k5a4lus
		ka4pl
		ka2pr
		4karm
		4kaset
		k5asj
		kat4r
		2k3b
		2kd4
		1k2e
		ke4el
		kee3lu
		2kehi
		4keks
		ke4laj
		ke4lak
		ke4lok
		4kemb
		2ken.
		5kene
		keo2
		kes2k
		kesk3a4
